South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5570.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-9-525(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) A resident on the date of application for a disability license, with quadriplegia or paraplegia, or who is certified, by one of the governmental agencies listed in Section 50-9-525(A), as totally and permanently disabled, must be issued a lifetime disability combination license or a lifetime disability fishing license at no cost. Disability recertification or renewal of this license is not required. SECTION 2.  Section 50-9-920(B)(12) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (12) resident antler restriction individual antlered deer tag shall be used to administer the Coyote and Hog Management Program. No later than January thirty-first of each year, the department must file with the General Assembly a report on the use of these funds during the preceding year; SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. The provisions contained in SECTION 2 of this act are effective both until and after December 31, 2027. ----XX----